Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 7 Special Officers for Protection of Railroad Property

Cross references.

Employment and training of peace officers generally, Ch. 8, T. 35.

46-8-230.
Appointment of officers by Governor; power of arrest; source of compensation.

Upon the application of the president or resident executive officer of any railroad corporation operating and doing business in this state as a common carrier, the Governor may appoint one or more persons as special officers for the protection of the property and interest of such corporation, with powers to make arrests, provided that such special officers must be paid by the corporation applying for such appointment; provided, further, that such special officers shall not receive any compensation from the state or any county thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 465, § 1.

46-8-231.
Powers, duties, and responsibilities of officers generally.

All special officers appointed and commissioned as provided for in this article shall have throughout the state all the powers, duties, and responsibilities of sheriffs or other law enforcement officers of the state while engaged in the performance of their duties as such railroad officers, except the serving of civil processes.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 465, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 390.

46-8-232.
Qualifications of officers; posting of bond; duration of appointment and commission; filing notice of termination by corporation; revocation of appointment and commission.

Every special officer appointed and commissioned under this article shall be a resident of the United States and of good character. Every such officer shall be required to post a good and sufficient bond payable to the State of Georgia in the sum of $1,000.00, conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties.

All appointments and commissions issued under this article shall continue so long as the special officer is employed in such capacity by the railroad corporation. The authority of any person appointed under this article shall immediately cease whenever such person ceases to be an agent, servant, or employee of the corporation applying for the appointment or no longer serves as a special officer of such corporation.

Whenever any railroad corporation no longer requires the services of any special officer so appointed, it shall file written notice to that effect in the offices of the Governor and the Secretary of State.

The appointment and commission may be revoked at any time by the Governor, with or without written notice by the president or resident executive officer of the common carrier applying for the appointment and commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 465, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 390, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1183, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 308, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 856, § 3.

46-8-233.
Return of processes to county of origin.

All criminal processes served by a special officer shall be returned by him to the county from which the same originated.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 465, § 4.